Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-914
Solar energy systems; wind energy conversion systems; restricted by regulation or ordinance; variance or exception; when granted.

When the application of any zoning or subdivision regulation or ordinance would prevent or unduly restrict the use of solar energy systems or wind energy conversion systems, the governing body of the county or municipality having zoning or subdivision jurisdiction is authorized to grant a variance or exception from the strict application thereof so as to relieve such restriction and protect access to solar energy or wind energy if such relief may be granted without substantial detriment to the public good and without substantially impairing the intent and purpose of such regulation or ordinance.

Laws 1979, LB 353, § 14;

Laws 1997, LB 140, § 11.